Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 2. Officers

§ 491.
Election; notice to clerk.

At each annual meeting, an incorporated school district shall elect from among the legal voters of such district a moderator, collector, and treasurer and may elect a clerk. All school officers shall enter upon their duties on July 1, following their election or appointment. If a clerk is elected or appointed, then the clerk shall notify the town clerk within ten days of the election or appointment.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 492.
Powers, duties, and liabilities; bonds.

The powers, duties, and liabilities of the collector, treasurer, prudential committee, and clerk shall be like those of a town collector, treasurer, board of school directors, and the school board clerk, respectively.

Before entering upon their duties, the collector and treasurer shall give a bond to the district conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties, in such sum as may be required. When a collector or treasurer for ten days neglects to give a bond as required, his or her office shall be vacant.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. July 1, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 52, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 493.
Moderator.

The moderator shall preside at such district meetings; and, in his or her absence, a moderator pro tempore shall be chosen to preside.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 53, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 494.
Collector of taxes.

The district may elect the collector of town taxes to be collector of taxes for the district, although he or she is not an inhabitant of that district. When a collector accepts the office, he or she shall do so in writing, and the acceptance shall be recorded by the clerk.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 54, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 495.
Vacancies.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of a district officer, the district shall fill the vacancy at a special meeting.

A vacancy occurring in the office of clerk of an incorporated school district caused by death, resignation, or otherwise shall be filled by the prudential committee within ten days after such vacancy occurs.

§ 496.
Books and papers to be turned over to successor.

When a district office becomes vacant by expiration of the term of office of the incumbent or otherwise, and a successor is elected or appointed, the successor shall, on demand, be entitled to receive the books and papers of the office from the last incumbent or anyone having the books and papers in his or her possession. A person having books or papers in his or her possession who refuses for ten days, after demand, to surrender them to the successor shall be fined $10.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 55, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.